Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 540D of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "First responder" shall include a peace officer as defined
in Section 99 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, a correctional
or probation and parole officer, and an emergency medical technician
or emergency medical care provider; and

HB1597 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. "Harass" means to willfully engage in a course of conduct
directed at a first responder which intentionally distracts the
first responder from performing his or her official duties and
serves no legitimate purpose.
B. It shall be unlawful for a person, after receiving a verbal
warning not to approach from a person he or she knows or reasonably
should know is a first responder, who is engaged in the lawful
performance of a legal duty, to knowingly and willfully violate such
warning and approach or remain within twenty-five (25) feet of the
first responder with the intent to:
1. Impede or interfere with the ability of the first responder
to perform such duty;
2. Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or
3. Harass the first responder.
C. Any person who violates the provisions of this section
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1)
year, or by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2025 – DO PASS, As Amended.


HB1597 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.